Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 675.110 is amended to read:
675.110. In addition to the powers otherwise granted under ORS 675.010  to 675.150, the Oregon
Board of Psychology has all powers necessary or proper to:
(1) Determine qualifications of applicants  to practice psychology in this state, prepare, conduct
and grade  examinations and license qualified applicants who comply with the provisions of ORS
675.010 to 675.150 and the rules of the board.
(2) Grant or deny renewal of licenses  and renew licenses that have lapsed for nonpayment of the
renewal fee, subject to the provisions of ORS 675.010 to 675.150.
(3) Suspend or revoke licenses, subject to ORS 675.010 to 675.150.
(4) Issue  letters of reprimand and impose probationary periods with the authority to restrict the
scope of practice of a licensed psychologist or to require practice under supervision.
(5) Impose civil penalties as provided in ORS 675.070.
(6) Restore  licenses that have been suspended or revoked or voided by nonpayment of the re-
newal fee.
(7) Collect fees for application, examination and  licensing of applicants, for renewal of licenses
and for issuance of limited permits  and use the fees to defray the expenses of the board as provided
in ORS 675.140.
(8) Collect a delinquent  renewal fee for licenses renewed after the deadline for renewal but be-
fore the grace period for renewal has expired.
(9) Investigate alleged violations of ORS 675.010 to 675.150.
(10) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, take testimony, administer oaths or  affir-
mations to witnesses, conduct hearings and require the production  of relevant documents in all
proceedings pertaining to the duties and powers of the board.
(11) Enforce ORS 675.010 to 675.150 and exercise general supervision over the practice  of psy-
chology in this state.
(12) Adopt a common seal.
(13) Formulate a code of professional conduct for the practice of psychology giving  particular
consideration to the Ethical Standards of  Psychologists promulgated by the American Psychological
Association.
Enrolled Senate Bill 789 (SB 789-INTRO) Page 1
(14) Establish standards of service and training and educational qualifications for rendering
ethical psychological services in this state, including the formulation of standards for the  issuance
of licenses for areas of special competence.
(15) Formulate  and enforce continuing education requirements for duly licensed psychologists
to ensure the highest quality of professional services to the public.
(16) Deny renewal of a license, or renewal of  a license that has lapsed for nonpayment of the
renewal fee, unless the applicant completes, or provides documentation of completion within the
previous 36 months of:
(a) A  one-hour pain management education program approved by the board and developed based
on recommendations of the Pain Management Commission; or
(b) An equivalent pain management education program, as determined by the board.
(17) Assess costs associated with a  disciplinary action to the person against whom the
board takes the disciplinary action, as follows:
(a) For total costs of $3,000 or less, the board may not assess any costs.
(b) For total costs greater than $3,000 but not greater than $6,000, the  board may assess
up to 50 percent of the total costs.
(c) For  total costs greater than $6,000, the board may assess up to 100 percent of the
total costs.
[(17)] (18) For the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for a license [ that is] issued by the board;
(b) Applying for renewal of a license [ that is] issued by the board; or
(c) Under investigation by the board.
[(18)] (19) Prescribe, in consultation with the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors
and Therapists, the duties of the Director of the Mental Health Regulatory Agency.
[(19)] (20) Subject to the  applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, adopt reasonable rules to
carry out the provisions of ORS 675.010 to 675.150.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 675.110 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to dis-
ciplinary actions taken on or after the operative date specified in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 675.110 by section 1 of  this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Board of Psychology may take any action before  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS 675.110 by section
1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 789 (SB 789-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 789 (SB 789-INTRO) Page 3